Illinois, session 104th, SB3970.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by changing 5Section 8-106 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 5/8-106 new)7    Sec. 8-106. Natural gas distribution; cost-benefit 8analysis. 9    (a) Prior to approving or directing any decarbonization 10pathway, pilot program, infrastructure investment, or 11regulatory mandate related to the natural gas distribution 12system, the Commission shall conduct a comprehensive, 13independent cost-benefit analysis that evaluates:14        (1) life-cycle greenhouse gas emissions reductions;15        (2) cumulative energy system costs, including any 16    stranded asset risks estimated at no less than 17    $80,000,000,000 by 2050 under high-electrification 18    scenarios;19        (3) ratepayer bill impacts for all customers, with a 20    focus on low-income and non-migrating customers;21        (4) system reliability and safety under State 22    standards;23        (5) equity impacts, including cost shifts to   SB3970- 2 -LRB104 19038 AAS 32483 b1    vulnerable populations;2        (6) workforce and job impacts; and3        (7) the extent to which competitive market mechanisms, 4    such as private investment, third-party financing, and 5    supplier competition, can achieve equivalent or superior 6    outcomes at lower costs.7    (b) The Commission shall not approve a decarbonization 8pathway, pilot program, infrastructure investment, or 9regulatory mandate unless the pathway, program, investment, or 10mandate demonstrates net benefits under the cost-benefit 11analysis without prioritizing an approach where regulated 12solutions increase costs without proportional benefits. The 13Commission shall use transparent, market-based data from 14sources such as PJM Interconnection, LLC (PJM), Midcontinent 15Independent System Operator, Inc. (MISO), and Chicago Citygate 16and coordinate with applicable biennial long-term gas 17infrastructure plans.